Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 2
Disclosure

§ 28-43-201. Compliance with federal Consumer Credit Protection Act.

A person upon whom the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act, including regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, imposes duties or obligations, shall make or give to the debtor the disclosures, information, and notices required of him by that act and in all respects comply with that act. This section imposes the duty on a creditor to comply with the terms of the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act only with respect to those credit transactions to which the Federal Consumer Credit Protection Act by its terms applies.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-201, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-202. Notice of assignment.

A debtor may pay the original creditor until he receives notification of assignment of rights to payment pursuant to a regulated consumer credit transaction and that payment is to be made to the assignee. A notification which does not reasonably identify the rights assigned is ineffective. If requested by the debtor, the assignee shall seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made and unless he does so, the debtor may pay the original creditor.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-202, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-203. Change in terms of open-end consumer credit accounts.

Whether or not a change is authorized by prior agreement, a creditor may change the terms of an open-end consumer credit account applying to any balance incurred before or after the effective date of the change.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-203, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-204. Receipts — Statements of account — Evidence of payment.

The creditor shall deliver or mail to the debtor, without request, a written receipt for each payment by coin or currency on an obligation pursuant to a regulated consumer credit transaction. A periodic statement showing a payment received by mail complies with this subsection.

Upon written request of a debtor, the person to whom an obligation is owed pursuant to a regulated consumer credit transaction, except one pursuant to open-end consumer credit, shall provide a written statement of the dates and amounts of payments made within the twelve (12) months preceding the month in which the request is received and the total amount unpaid as of the end of the period covered by the statement. The statement shall be provided without charge once during each year of the term of the obligation. If additional statements are requested, the creditor may make a reasonable charge not in excess of ten dollars ($10.00) for each additional statement.

After a debtor has fulfilled all obligations with respect to a regulated consumer credit transaction, except one pursuant to open-end consumer credit, the person to whom the obligation was owed, upon request of the debtor, shall deliver or mail to the debtor written evidence acknowledging payment in full of all obligations with respect to the transaction.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-204, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-43-205. Form of insurance premium loan agreement.

An agreement pursuant to which an insurance premium loan is made shall contain the names of the insurance agent or broker negotiating each policy or contract and of the insurer issuing each policy or contract, the number and inception date of, and premium for, each policy or contract, the date on which the term of the loan begins, and a clear and conspicuous notice that each policy or contract may be cancelled if payment is not made in accordance with the agreement. If a policy or contract has not been issued by the time the agreement is signed, the agreement may provide that the insurance agent or broker may insert the appropriate information in the agreement and, if he does so, shall furnish the information promptly in writing to the insured.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-43-205, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.